Louisiana, session 2026, SB2.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Louisiana
Highway 977, also known as Valverda Road, beginning on the Pointe Coupee side of
the parish line between Pointe Coupee and Iberville parishes, extending through Pointe
Coupee Parish and ending at the intersection of Maringouin Road West, is hereby
designated as "The Falcons Band Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs of this designation provided local or
private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs
for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of each sign, not to exceed
the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.